Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB832.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Blue Star Family Tribute Roundabout.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Blue Star Family designation honors families with a member currently serving in the United States Armed Forces, symbolizing their sacrifice and commitment to the nation.(2) Bucks County has a strong tradition of military service, with many residents actively serving in the United States Armed Forces, earning their families the Blue Star designation.1234567891011121314151617181920 (3) Designating a roundabout in Doylestown Township as the Blue Star Family Tribute Roundabout recognizes the ongoing contributions and sacrifices of these families within the community.(4) This designation serves as a lasting tribute to inspire community gratitude and support for military families.(b) Designation.--The western roundabout on State Route 1001 at the intersection of New Britain Road and South Easton Road in Doylestown Township, Bucks County, is designated the Blue Star Family Tribute Roundabout.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the roundabout on the major approaches to the roundabout.Section 2. Gold Star Family Tribute Roundabout.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The Gold Star Family designation recognizes families who have lost a loved one in military service, representing the ultimate sacrifice made for the freedoms enjoyed by all Americans.(2) Bucks County is home to families who have endured the profound loss of a service member, earning the Gold Star designation.(3) Designating a roundabout in Doylestown Township as the Gold Star Family Tribute Roundabout honors the memory of fallen service members and the enduring strength of their families.(4) This designation provides a permanent memorial to foster community reflection on the sacrifices of Gold Star 20250SB0832PN0900 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Families.(b) Designation.--The eastern roundabout on State Route 1001 at the intersection of New Britain Road and Sauerman Road in Doylestown Township, Bucks County, is designated the Gold Star Family Tribute Roundabout.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the roundabout on the major approaches to the roundabout.Section 3. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0832PN0900 - 3 - 12345678910